Connecticut, session 2026, HB05145.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) Not later than January 15, 2027, the
Public Utilities Regulatory Authority, in consultation with the
Department of Public Health, shall submit a report, in accordance with
the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to commerce, public health and energy. Such report
shall include a listing of each instance, in the most recent two calendar
years, in which a water company, as defined in section 16-262n of the
general statutes, submitted an application for consent of the authority
or department to cease its operations or discontinue the provision of
water service to customers pursuant to the provisions of section 16-46 of
the general statutes, as amended by this act. Such report shall include
(1) a docket timeline for each such application that specifies the dates of
any docket activity, (2) a list of any documents or other materials upon
which the authority relied in rendering a decision on such application,
including, but not limited to, responses to interrogatories, water quality
reports and written testimony, and (3) any other details concerning the

Substitute House Bill No. 5145
processing of such application that the authority deems appropriate to
include in such report.
Sec. 2. Section 16-46 of the general statutes is amended by adding
subsection (c) as follows (Effective from passage):
(NEW) (c) Not later than July 1, 2026, the Public Utilities Regulatory
Authority shall initiate a docket for the purpose of adopting regulations,
in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, requiring that, in any
notice of a proceeding conducted pursuant to this section that is issued
by the authority, the authority shall provide written instructions that
inform a water company of the process whereby such company may
request an expedited review of a request made pursuant to this section.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Public Act No. 26-123 2 of 2